Utah statutes.
76-5-102.8.   Disarming a peace officer -- Penalties.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Conductive energy device" means a weapon that uses electrical current to disrupt voluntary control of muscles.

(b)  "Firearm" has the same meaning as in Section 76-10-501.

(2) An actor is guilty of an offense under Subsection (3) who intentionally takes or removes, or attempts to take or remove a firearm or a conductive energy device from the person or immediate presence of a person the actor knows is a peace officer:

(a)  without the consent of the peace officer; and

(b)  while the peace officer is acting within the scope of his authority as a peace officer.

(3) (a)  Conduct under Subsection (2) regarding a firearm is a first degree felony.

(b)  Conduct under Subsection (2) regarding a conductive energy device is a third degree felony.

